District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
23 act may be cited as “Certified Business Enterprise Program Protection Amendment Act of 2025”.
24 Sec. 2. Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
25 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), is
26 amended as follows:
27 (a) Sec. 2302 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.02) is amended as follows:
28 (1) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
29 “(7) “Economically disadvantaged individual” means an individual who
30 owns at least a 51% interest in a business enterprise and whose personal net worth does not ex-
31 ceed the limits set by the federal Department of Transportation, pursuant to 49 CFR § 26.68.”.
32 (2) Paragraph (8A) is amended to read as follows:
33 “(8A) Equity impact enterprise” means a business enterprise that is a resi-
34 dent-owned business, small business enterprise, and disadvantaged business enterprise.”.
1

35 (3) Paragraph (9) is redesignated as paragraph (8B).
36 (4) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
37 “(9) “Formal complaint” means a complaint that is submitted to the De-
38 partment in writing, sworn to by the complainant, and notarized.”.
39 (5) A new paragraph (10A) is added to read as follows:
40 “(10A) “Independently owned and operated” means that the business en-
41 terprise manages and controls its day-to-day operations without being subject to control, re-
42 striction, modification, or limitation by another business enterprise or not-for-profit business that
43 has an ownership or other financial interest in the business enterprise.”
44 (6) A new paragraph (10B) is added to read as follows:
45 “(10B) “Informal complaint” means a complaint other than a formal com-
46 plaint and includes complaints submitted in person, by email, by telephone, or through
47 the Department’s complaint hotline.”.
48 (7) Paragraph (13) is redesignated as paragraph (12B).
49 (8) A new paragraph (13) is added to read as follows:
50 “(13) “Managerial Functions” means the staffing, planning, organizing,
51 directing, coordinating, and overall controlling of the business’s activities.”.
52 (9) Paragraph (13A) is amended to read as follows:
53 “(13A) “Material change” means a change in:
54 “(A) The business enterprise’s ownership;
55 “(B) The address of the business enterprise’s principal office;
56 “(C) The business enterprise’s size, if the business is certified as a
57 small enterprise; or
2

58 “(D) Any other characteristic of the business that affects whether
59 the business continues to qualify for certification under a CBE category under which the business
60 enterprise is certified.”.
61 (10) Paragraph (13B) is redesignated as paragraph (13C).
62 (11) A new paragraph (13B) is added to read as follows:
63 “(13B) “Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture,
64 general partner of a partnership, limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership,
65 foreign limited liability partnership, association, corporation, unincorporated business, company,
66 syndicate, estate, trust, business trust, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, executor, adminis-
67 trator, assignee, fiduciary, or entity of any kind.”.
68 (b) Section 2331 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.31) is amended by adding a new
69 paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
70 "(1A) Is:
71 "(A) Independently owned and operated;
72 "(B) More than 50% owned, operated, and controlled by a District-
73 based enterprise or not-for-profit business; or
74 "(C) Owned by a non-District-based business enterprise that is
75 more than 50% owned by District residents".
76 (c) Sec. 2338 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.38) is amended as follows:
77 (1) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
78 “(4) One or more veterans control the managerial functions of the business
79 enterprise.”.
80 (d) Sec. 2346 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.46) is amended as follows:
3

81 (1) Paragraph (b)(2)(A) is amended to read as follows:
82 “(2)(A) Each government-assisted construction and non-construction con-
83 tract for which a certified joint venture is selected as a beneficiary and is granted points or a price
84 reduction pursuant to § 2-218.43 or is selected through a set-aside program under this subpart
85 shall include a requirement that each certified business enterprise holding a majority or minority
86 interest in the certified joint venture shall, with its own organization and resources, perform a per-
87 centage of the work equal to or greater than its percentage interest in the joint venture, and, if the
88 certified joint venture subcontracts, at least 35% of the subcontracted effort shall be with certi-
89 fied business enterprises.”.
90 (e) Sec. 2361 (D.C. Official Code § 2–218.61) is amended as follows:
91 (1) Subsection (c-1) is amended by adding a new paragraph (4) to read as
92 follows:
93 “(4) A certified business enterprise shall report a material change to the
94 Department within 30 days of having actual knowledge or notice that a material change has oc-
95 curred.”.
96 (f) Section 2363 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.63) is amended as follows:
97 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
98 (A) Paragraph (2)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and in-
99 serting a semicolon in its place.
100 (B) A new paragraph (D) is added to read as follows:
101 “(D) Fails to report a material change to the Department within 30
102 days of having actual knowledge or notice that a material change has occurred; or”.
4

103 (2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “, in accordance with
104 procedures set forth in subsection (e) of this section,”.
105 (3) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
106 (A) Subsection (e)(1)(A) is amended to read as follows:
107 “(e)(1)(A) Any person may file with the Department a formal or
108 informal complaint alleging a violation of this act.
109 “(B) The Department shall maintain a hotline for the
110 filing of informal complaints.
111 “(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection,
112 the Department shall investigate each formal or informal complaint filed with it.
113 “(3) The Department may dismiss a complaint without con-
114 ducting an investigation if the Department determines the complaint is frivolous or otherwise
115 without merit. If the Department dismisses a formal complaint as frivolous or otherwise without
116 merit, the Department shall prepare a report that includes:”
117 “(A) A statement detailing the formal complaint,
118 including the name, address, and telephone number of the person filing the complaint;”
119 “(B) The name of the person or certified joint ven-
120 ture alleged to be in violation of this act;
121 “(C) The facts and law that are considered in rendering
122 the determination; and
123 “(D) Any other information considered in rendering
124 the determination.”.
125 (B) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
5

126 (C) New paragraphs (5) and (6) are added to read as follows:
127 “(5) After the completion of an investigation conducted pursuant to
128 this subsection, the Department shall take such enforcement action, if any, it deems appropriate.
129 “(6) The Department shall maintain a record listing all formal com-
130 plaints, which shall contain:
131 “(A) The name of the person alleged to be in violation of
132 this act;
133 “(B) The date the formal complaint was made to the De-
134 partment; and
135 “(C) A description of the formal complaint.”.
136 (4) Subsection (g) is amended to read as follows:
137 “(g)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, before issu-
138 ing a civil penalty to, or denying, suspending, changing, or revoking a certification, a person or a
139 certified joint venture, the Department shall issue a notice of determination to the person or certi-
140 fied joint venture. The notice of determination shall describe the:
141 “(A) Basis for the Department’s determination;
142 “(B) Proposed penalty, if any; and
143 “(C) Process and timeline by which the person or certified
144 joint venture may request a hearing.
145 “(2) Pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person, or a
146 designated representative on behalf of a certified joint venture, may request a hearing before the
147 Office of Administrative Hearings within 10 days after receiving the notice. If the person or certi-
148 fied joint venture does not request a hearing within that time, the civil penalty, denial, suspension,
6

149 change, or revocation shall become final, and the person or certified joint venture shall be
150 deemed to have waived the opportunity for judicial review.
151 “(3) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hear-
152 ings shall consider the matter pursuant to section 19 of the Office of Administrative Hearings Es-
153 tablishment Act of 2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-
154 1831.16), and the rules issued pursuant to it. The Department shall bear the burden of establish-
155 ing the violation by a preponderance of the evidence.
156 “(4) The Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct such
157 hearing based on the record developed by the Department. The decision of the Office of Adminis-
158 trative Hearings shall be the final administrative decision for the purpose of judicial review.
159 “(5) Notice of a final suspension or revocation of a certification
160 shall be published on the Department’s website.”
161 “(6) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certification has
162 been revoked shall not be eligible to apply for a new certification from the Department until 36
163 months after the date that the revocation became final.”
164 “(7)(A) The Department may at any time, upon motion by a busi-
165 ness enterprise or joint venture whose certification has been suspended or revoked, remove the
166 suspension or reissue a certification if the Department determines that it is in the District govern-
167 ment’s interest to remove the suspension or reissue the certification before the end of the 36-
168 month period and the removal or reissuance will not endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the
169 general public.
170 “(B) In determining whether to remove a suspension or re-
171 issue a certification, the Department shall consider whether the business enterprise or joint
7

172 venture submitted satisfactory proof that conditions within, or actions by, the business enterprise
173 or joint venture that led to the suspension or revocation have been corrected.
174 “(C) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certifica-
175 tion is reissued shall cease to be subject to the 36-month waiting period established in paragraph
176 (6) of this subsection.
177 “(8)(A) If, after an investigation, the Department determines that a
178 business enterprise or joint venture certified under this act has violated any provision of this act in
179 such a manner as to present an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare of any person or
180 the general public, the Department may summarily suspend the certification of the business enter-
181 prise or joint venture upon issuing the notice of determination described in paragraph (1) of this
182 subsection.
183 “(B)(i) The notice of determination shall inform the busi-
184 ness enterprise or joint venture of the reason for the summary suspension and the right to request
185 a hearing before the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to this subsection.
186 “(ii) If a business enterprise or joint venture timely
187 requests a hearing on a summary suspension, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct
188 the hearing within 14 days after receiving the request, unless a longer period of time is agreed to
189 by the business enterprise or joint venture, and shall issue a decision within 14 days after the rec-
190 ord of the hearing closes.”.
191 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
192 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
193 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, ap-
194 proved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
8

195 Sec. 4. Effective date.
196 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
197 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
198 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
199 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
200 Register.
9